Massachusetts, session 194th, S1890.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 32A Section 3 is hereby amended by inserting the following words after Local 
254 S.E.I.U.: , “1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts Organization of State 
Engineers and Scientists."